Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
WATER POLLUTION CONTROL

§342D-50 Prohibition. (a) No person,
including any public body, shall discharge any water pollutant into state
waters, or cause or allow any water pollutant to enter state waters except in
compliance with this chapter, rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, or a
permit or variance issued by the director.

(b) No person, including any public body,
shall knowingly establish, extend, or alter any system of drainage, sewage, or
water supply, or undertake any project in sewage outfall areas where there may
be a possibility of alteration of currents depended upon for dilution without
first securing approval in writing from the director.

(c) No person, including any industrial user,
shall discharge any water pollutant or effluent into a publicly owned treatment
works or sewerage system in violation of:

(1) A pretreatment standard established by the
department or the publicly owned treatment works; or

(2) A pretreatment condition in a permit issued by
the department or a publicly owned treatment works.

(d) No person, including any public body,
shall violate any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter or any permit or
variance issued or modified pursuant to this chapter. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §2;
am L 1995, c 180, §14]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next